Washington statutes.
RCW 35.76.040

Manual of instructions.

The state auditor, after consultation with the association of Washington cities and the planning division of the state department of transportation shall prepare and distribute to the cities and towns a manual of instructions governing accounting and reporting procedures for all street expenditures.

[ 1984 c 7 s 21; 1965 c 7 s 35.76.040. Prior: 1963 c 115 s 4.]